District of Columbia statutes.
42-2812.05

Sale of the bonds.

(a)

The bonds of any series may be sold at negotiated or competitive sale at, above, or below par, to one or more persons or entities, and upon terms that the Mayor considers to be in the best interests of the District.

(b)

The Mayor or an Authorized Delegate may execute, in connection with each sale of the bonds, offering documents on behalf of the District, may deem final any such offering document on behalf of the District for purposes of compliance with federal laws and regulations governing such matters, and may authorize the distribution of the documents in connection with the sale of the bonds.

(c)

The Mayor is authorized to deliver the executed and sealed bonds, on behalf of the District, for authentication, and, after the bonds have been authenticated, to deliver the bonds to the original purchasers of the bonds upon payment of the purchase price.

(d)

The bonds shall not be issued until the Mayor receives an approving opinion from Bond Counsel as to the validity of the bonds of such series and, if the interest on the bonds is expected to be exempt from federal income taxation, the treatment of the interest on the Bonds for purposes of federal income taxation.

(e)

Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2 and subchapter III-A of Chapter 3 of Title 47 shall not apply to any contract the Mayor may from time to time enter into for purposes of this subchapter or the Mayor may determine to be necessary or appropriate for purposes of this subchapter to place, in whole or in part:

(1)

An investment or obligation of the District as represented by the bonds;

(2)

An investment or obligation of program of investment; or

(3)

A contract or contracts based on the interest rate, currency, cash flow, or other basis, including, without limitation, interest rate swap agreements; currency swap agreements; insurance agreements; forward payment conversion agreements; futures contracts providing for payments based on levels of, or changes in, interest rates, currency exchange rates, or stock or other indices; contracts to exchange cash flows or a series of payments; and contracts to hedge payment, currency, rate, spread or similar exposure, including, without limitation, interest rate floors, or caps, options, puts, and calls.

The contracts or other arrangements may also be entered into by the District in connection with, or incidental to, entering into or maintaining any agreement that secures the bonds. The contracts or other arrangements shall contain whatever payment security, terms, and conditions as the Mayor may consider appropriate and shall be entered into with whatever party or parties the Mayor may select, after giving due consideration, where applicable, to the creditworthiness of the counterparty or counterparties, including any rating by a nationally recognized rating agency or any other criteria as may be appropriate. In connection with, or incidental to, the issuance or holding of the bonds, or entering into any contract or other arrangement referred to in this section, the District may enter into credit enhancement or liquidity agreements, with payment, interest rate, termination date, currency, security, default, remedy, any other terms and conditions as the Mayor determines. Proceeds of the bonds and any money set aside and pledged to secure payment of the bonds or any contract or other arrangement entered into pursuant to this section may be pledged to and used to service any contract or other arrangement entered into pursuant to this section.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-202, § 205
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2172(c), 52 DCR 7503
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2172(c) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).